lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Dubenėliai, šėryklos ir girdyklos naminiams gyvūnams: Automatinės šėryklos; Dubenėliai; Paaukštinti dubenėliai; Gravitacinės šėryklos; Lėto šėrimo dubenėliai; Kelioniniai dubenėliai; Vandens dozatoriai; Vandens fontanai
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > ชามอาหารและน้ำสำหรับสัตว์เลี้ยง: เครื่องให้อาหารอัตโนมัติ; ชาม; ชามยกระดับ; เครื่องให้อาหารตามแรงโน้มถ่วง; ชามให้อาหารแบบช้า; ชามอาหารเดินทาง; เครื่องจ่ายน้ำ; น้ำพุ
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Bát ăn, dụng cụ cấp đồ ăn và nước cho thú cưng: Máy cho ăn tự động; Bát; Bát chống gù; Bình đựng thức ăn tự động nạp; Bát ăn chậm; Bát ăn du lịch; Máy nước nóng lạnh; Đài phun nước uống
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Μπολ, ταΐστρες & ποτίστρες για κατοικίδια ζώα: Αυτόματες ταΐστρες; Μπολ; Ανυψωμένα μπολ; Ταΐστρες βαρύτητας; Κύπελλα αργής τροφοδοσίας; Μπολ ταξιδιού; Διανομείς νερού; Συντριβάνια νερού
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Миски, кормушки и поилки для домашних животных: Автоматические кормушки; Миски; Миски на подставке; Механические кормушки; Миски для медленного поедания корма; Дорожные миски; Автоматические поилки; Поилки-фонтанчики
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Ciotole, distributori di cibo, distributori di acqua per animali domestici: Alimentatori automatici; Recipienti; Ciotole rialzate; Alimentatori a gravità; Ciotole ad alimentazione lenta; Ciotole da viaggio; Distributori d'acqua; Fontane d'acqua
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Futter- & Wasserspender: Automatische Futterspender; Schüsseln; Erhöhte Näpfe; Schwerkraft-Futterspender; Slow-Feeder-Näpfe; Reisenäpfe; Wasserspender; Trinkbrunnen
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Gamelles, mangeoires et abreuvoirs: Mangeoires automatiques; Bols; Bols surélevés; Mangeoires par gravité; Bols à alimentation lente; Bols de voyage; Distributeurs d’eau fraîche; Fontaines d’eau
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Купи, хранилки и поилки за домашни любимци: Автоматични хранилки; Купи; Повдигнати купи; Гравитационни хранилки; Купички за бавно хранене; Купи за пътуване; Диспенсъри за вода; Водни фонтани
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Háziállattálak, -etetők és -itatók: Automatikus etetők; Tálak; Emelt tálak; Gravitációs etetők; Lassú etetőtálak; Utazótálak; Vízadagolók; Vízszökőkutak
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Pet Bowls, Feeders & Waterers: Automatic Feeders; Bowls; Elevated Bowls; Gravity Feeders; Slow Feeder Bowls; Travel Bowls; Water Dispensers; Water Fountains
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Tigelas, comedouros e bebedouros para animais de estimação: Comedouros automáticos; Taças; Tigelas com elevação; Dispensadores de alimento automáticos; Tigelas anti asfixia; Tigelas de viagem; Distribuidores de água; Bebedouros de repuxo
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Misky, kŕmidlá a napájadlá pre domácich miláčikov: Automatické dávkovače krmiva; Misky; Vyvýšené misky; Gravitačné dávkovače krmiva; Misky s pomalým dávkovaním krmiva; Cestovné misky; Dávkovače vody; Vodné fontány
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Skålar, mat- och vattenautomater för husdjur: Automatiska matare; Skålar; Upphöjda skålar; Gravitationsmatare; Långsamt matande skålar; Reseskålar; Vattenautomater; Vattenfontäner
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 宠物碗/喂食机/饮水器: 自动喂食机; 碗; 高架碗; 重力喂食器; 慢速喂食碗; 旅行碗; 饮水机; 饮水设备
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Cuencos, comederos, y bebederos para mascotas: Alimentadores automáticos; Tazones; Cuencos elevados; Alimentadores por gravedad; Cuencos de alimentación lenta; Cuencos de viaje; Dispensadores de agua; Fuentes de agua
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 寵物碗/給飼料器/供水器: 自動餵食器; 碗; 架高飼料碗; 落下式餵食器; 慢食碗; 旅行飼料碗; 飲水機; 噴泉飲水機
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Misky a dávkovače krmiva a vody: Automatické dávkovače krmiva; Mísy; Vyvýšené misky; Gravitační krmítka; Zpomalovací misky; Cestovní misky; Zásobníky pitné vody; Fontánky na vodu
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Boluri, dispozitive de hrănire și adăpători pentru animale de companie: Dispozitive de hrănire automate; Boluri; Boluri supraînălțate; Dispozitive de hrănire gravitaționale; Boluri pentru hrănire lentă; Boluri de călătorie; Dozatoare de apă; Fântâni pentru apă
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Voer- en drinkbakken voor huisdieren: Automatische voerbakken; Kommen; Verhoogde kommen; Zwaartekrachtvoerbakken; Langzame voerbakken; Reiskommen; Waterdispensers; Waterfonteinen
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 식기/급식기/급수기: 자동 급식기; 그릇; 높은 볼; 중력 방식 급식기; 급체 방지 급식기 볼; 여행용 볼; 정수기; 급수기
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Sklede, krmilniki in vodni napajalniki za hišne ljubljenčke: Avtomatski krmilniki; Sklede; Dvignjene sklede; Gravitacijski napajalniki; Sklede za počasno hranjenje; Potovalne sklede; Podajalniki vode; Vodne fontane
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Skåle, foderautomater og drikkeflasker til kæledyr: Automatiske foderautomater; Skåle; Forhøjede skåle; Hævede drikkeflasker; Madskåle til langsom spisning; Rejseskåle; Vanddispenser; Vandfontæner
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > ペット用食器・給餌給水器: 自動フィーダー; ボウル; エレベーテッドボウル; 重力フィーダー; スローフィーダーボウル; トラベル用ボウル; ウォーターサーバー; ウォーターファウンテン
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Husdyrskåler, fôrere og vannbeholdere: Automatiske matere; Boller; Forhøyede boller; Tyngdekraftsmatere; Boller for sakte mating; Reiseboller; Vanndispensere; Vannfontener
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Zdjele, hranilice i pojilice za kućne ljubimce: Automatske hranilice; Zdjele; Povišene zdjele; Gravitacijske hranilice; Zdjele za sporo hranjenje; Putne zdjele; Dozatori za vodu; Vodene fontane
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Tigelas, alimentadores e bebedouros para animais de estimação: Alimentadores automáticos; Tigelas; Tigelas elevadas; Alimentadores gravitacionais; Tigelas de alimentação lenta; Tigelas de viagem; Suportes para água; Fontes de água
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Miski, podajniki karmy i poidełka dla zwierząt: Podajniki automatyczne; Miski; Miski na stelażu; Podajniki grawitacyjne; Miski spowalniające jedzenie; Miski podróżne; Dystrybutory wody; Fontanny dla zwierząt
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikin ruokakupit ja ruoka- ja vesiautomaatit: Automaattiset ruokintalaitteet; Kulhot; Korotetut kulhot; Painovoimalla toimivat syöttölaitteet; Hitaaseen syömiseen kannustavat kulhot; Matkakulhot; Vesiautomaatit; Vesilähteet
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Mama Kapları, Yemlikleri ve Sulukları: Otomatik Besleyiciler; Kaseler; Yükseltilmiş Kaseler; Yerçekimi İle Çalışan Besleyiciler; Yavaş Besleyici Kaseler; Seyahat Kaseleri; Su Sebilleri; Su Pınarları